Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 8

Ordinances Affecting Railroad Operations

7-51-801. Filing with commissioner of transportation.

All incorporated cities and towns, as well as any areas adopting a metropolitan government within the state, shall file with the commissioner of transportation certified copies of all ordinances adopted by the governing body of such city, town or metropolitan government after July 1, 1983, that affect the operation of trains within the limits, or newly extended limits, when any such ordinances enlarge the municipal boundaries of such city, town or metropolitan government.

Acts 1983, ch. 54, § 2; 1995, ch. 305, § 77.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Transfer of railroad authority to department of transportation, OAG 97-026, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 25 (3/31/97).

7-51-802. Service of ordinances on railroads.

Upon receipt of copies of all such ordinances, the commissioner of transportation shall within seven (7) days cause to be mailed copies of the ordinances to the registered agent for service of process for each railroad operating trains within the state. A copy of the letter transmitting any such ordinance to the various railroads shall be furnished to the chief executive officer of the city, town or metropolitan government adopting such ordinance in question as proof of compliance with this part.

Acts 1983, ch. 54, § 3; 1995, ch. 305, § 77.

7-51-803. Railroad's agent for service of process.

Every railroad operating trains within the state shall notify the commissioner of transportation of the name and address of its registered agent for service of process.

Acts 1983, ch. 54, § 4; 1995, ch. 305, § 77.

7-51-804. Effective date of ordinances.

No ordinance required to be filed with the commissioner of transportation shall be effective as to the operation of any train until fifteen (15) days after the service of a copy of such ordinance upon the registered agent of the railroad operating such train.

As to any railroad failing to furnish to the commissioner the name and address of its registered agent for service of process, any ordinance affecting the operation of the trains of such railroad shall become effective upon receipt of the certified copy thereof by the commissioner.

Acts 1983, ch. 54, § 5; 1995, ch. 305, §§ 77, 78.